Utah statutes.
10-11-1.   Abatement of weeds, garbage, refuse, and unsightly objects.

A municipal legislative body may designate, and regulate the abatement of, injurious and noxious weeds, garbage, refuse, or any unsightly or deleterious objects or structures, and may appoint a municipal inspector for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

